Missouri, session 2026, SB1326.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 1, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 1.355, to read as
follows:
1.355. 1. There is hereby established the "Daylight
Saving as New Standard Time Pact" consisting of this state
and any other state desiring to permanently change daylight
saving time to a new standard time.
2. The state of Missouri hereby exempts all areas of
the state from the daylight saving time provisions of 15
U.S.C. Section 260a, as amended.
3. On the effective date of this section, Missouri
will switch clocks to daylight saving time for the last time
and daylight saving time will be eliminated. The time
formerly known as daylight saving time will become standard
time. After this time, Missouri will no longer observe
daylight saving time.
4. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsections 2 and
3 of this section to the contrary:
(1) If the federal government enforces the provisions
of 15 U.S.C. Section 260a, the state of Missouri and all

SB 1326 2
political subdivisions thereof shall observe standard time;
or
(2) If the federal government adopts daylight saving
time as the new standard time, the state of Missouri shall
set clocks to conform with the new standard time.
✓